Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska11-113
Bonds; irregularities; effect.

No official bond shall be rendered void by reason of any informality or irregularity in its execution or approval.

Laws 1881, c. 13, § 13, p. 97;

R.S.1913, § 5719;

C.S.1922, § 5049;

C.S.1929, § 12-113;

R.S.1943, § 11-113.

Bond of public officer, joint and several in form, is not void as to surety because of failure of principal to sign it. Village of Hampton v. Gausman, 136 Neb. 550, 286 N.W. 757 (1939).

Approval of bond after instead of before filing thereof is an irregularity which has no effect upon its validity. State v. Paxton, 65 Neb. 110, 90 N.W. 983 (1902).

The making of official bond joint in form, instead of joint and several, is a mere irregularity which does not invalidate the instrument. Term need not be stated. Perkins County v. Miller, 55 Neb. 141, 75 N.W. 577 (1898).